Utah statutes.
75-5-429.   Individual liability of conservator.
(1) Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a conservator is not
individually liable on a contract properly entered into in his fiduciary
capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless he fails to
reveal his representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.
(2)  The conservator is individually liable for obligations arising from
ownership or control of property of the estate or for torts committed in the
course of administration of the estate only if he is personally at fault.
(3)  Claims based on contracts entered into by a conservator in his fiduciary
capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate, or
on torts committed in the course of administration of the estate may be
asserted against the estate by proceeding against the conservator in his
fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is individually liable
therefor.
(4)  Any question of liability between the estate and the conservator
individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge,
indemnification, or other appropriate proceeding or action.
